Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1561.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the City of the First Class Residential High-Rise Fire Sprinkler Retrofit Tax Relief Act.Section 2. Residential High-Rise Fire Sprinkler Retrofit Tax Credit.(a) Tax credit.--For tax years beginning after December 31, 2025, the Office of the Mayor of a city of the first class may award a tax credit to the owner of a residential high-rise structure in an amount as determined under subsection (c) against any income tax imposed by the city of the first class.(b) Purpose of tax credit.--The tax credit under subsection (a) shall be for investment in retrofitting residential high-123456789101112131415161718 rise structures with an automatic fire sprinkler system and associated monitoring or detection devices.(c) Amount.--The amount of the tax credit awarded under subsection (a) shall equal the amount expended by the owner of the residential high-rise structure to install or improve an existing automatic fire sprinkler system and associated monitoring or detection devices or 100% of the owner's income tax liability, whichever is less.(d) Administration.--(1) The application for a tax credit awarded under subsection (a) shall be on a form and submitted in a manner as determined by the Office of the Mayor of the city of the first class in which the residential high-rise structure is located.(2) The Office of the Mayor of the city of the first class shall adopt guidelines, including forms, necessary to administer this act. The Office of the Mayor may require proof of the claim for tax credit.(3) The Office of the Mayor of the city of the first class shall define what constitutes a residential high-rise structure.(e) Applicability.--The tax credit awarded under subsection (a) may only apply to a residential high-rise structure located within a city of the first class.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1561PN1845 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526